Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202618-3541
Land in two districts; detachment from one district; approval.

When any land is a part of two community improvement districts and the owners of such land desire that it be a part of only one community improvement district, such owners shall file their request with the trustees or the administrator of each community improvement district. The trustees or the administrator of the community improvement districts shall meet jointly and develop an agreement for the detachment of the land from one of the community improvement districts and the adjustment of indebtedness. If the trustees or administrators are unable to reach an agreement, they shall file a petition in the district court of the county in which such land is located and the court shall have jurisdiction to detach the land and adjust the indebtedness. The clerk of the community improvement district shall notify the clerk of each city or village in which the community improvement districts are located and the county clerk, election commissioner, and register of deeds of each county or counties in which the community improvement districts are located of the agreement for detachment or the filing of the petition in district court.

Laws 2026, LB1114, § 41.
April 17, 2026